Wisconsin, session 2025, SB454.
do enact as follows:SB454,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB454,2,7271.05 (6) (b) 57. a. Except as provided in subd. 57. e. and f., for taxable years 3beginning after December 31, 2024, the amount, up to the limit specified in subd. 457. b., c., or d., whichever is applicable, of qualified overtime compensation received 5during the taxable year that is included on statements furnished to the claimant 6pursuant to section 6041 (d) (4) or 6051 (a) (19) of the Internal Revenue Code in 7effect for federal purposes or pursuant to s. 71.65 (1).SB454,2,118b. Except as provided in subd. 57. c. or d., the amount claimed by a claimant 9under this subdivision for a taxable year may not exceed $12,500, except that if a 10claimant files a joint return, the amount claimed by a claimant under this 11subdivision for a taxable year may not exceed $25,000.SB454,2,1512c. Except as provided in subd. 57. d., the amount claimed by a claimant under 13this subdivision for a taxable year may not exceed the amount specified in subd. 57. 14b. reduced, but not below zero, by $100 for each $1,000 by which the claimant’s 15modified federal adjusted gross income exceeds $150,000.SB454,3,216d. For a claimant who files a joint return for a taxable year, the amount 17claimed by the claimant under this subdivision for the taxable year may not exceed 18the amount specified in subd. 57. b. reduced, but not below zero, by $100 for each 1$1,000 by which the claimant’s modified federal adjusted gross income exceeds 2$300,000.SB454,3,53e. No subtraction under this subdivision may be claimed for a taxable year 4unless the claimant includes on the claimant’s tax return the claimant’s social 5security number.SB454,3,96f. No subtraction under this subdivision may be claimed for a taxable year by 7a person who is considered married under section 7703 of the Internal Revenue 8Code unless the person and the person’s spouse file a joint tax return for the taxable 9year.SB454,3,1210g. In this subdivision, “modified federal adjusted gross income” has the 11meaning given for “modified adjusted gross income” in section 225 (b) (2) (B) of the 12Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes.SB454,3,1713h. In this subdivision, “qualified overtime compensation” means qualified 14overtime compensation, as defined in section 225 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code 15in effect for federal purposes. “Qualified overtime compensation” does not include 16any qualified tip, as defined in section 224 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code in effect 17for federal purposes.SB454,218Section 2. 71.52 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB454,5,101971.52 (6) “Income” means the sum of Wisconsin adjusted gross income and 20the following amounts, to the extent not included in Wisconsin adjusted gross 21income: maintenance payments (except foster care maintenance and 22supplementary payments excludable under section 131 of the internal revenue 23code), support money, cash public assistance (not including credit granted under 24this subchapter and amounts under s. 46.27, 2017 stats.), cash benefits paid by 1counties under s. 59.53 (21), the gross amount of any pension or annuity (including 2railroad retirement benefits, all payments received under the federal social security 3act and veterans disability pensions), nontaxable interest received from the federal 4government or any of its instrumentalities, nontaxable interest received on state or 5municipal bonds, worker’s compensation, unemployment insurance, the gross 6amount of “loss of time” insurance, compensation and other cash benefits received 7from the United States for past or present service in the armed forces, scholarship 8and fellowship gifts or income, capital gains, gain on the sale of a personal residence 9excluded under section 121 of the internal revenue code, dividends, income of a 10nonresident or part-year resident who is married to a full-year resident, housing 11allowances provided to members of the clergy, the amount by which a resident 12manager’s rent is reduced, nontaxable income of an American Indian, qualified 13overtime compensation subtracted under s. 71.05 (6) (b) 57., nontaxable income 14from sources outside this state and nontaxable deferred compensation. Intangible 15drilling costs, depletion allowances and depreciation, including first-year 16depreciation allowances under section 179 of the internal revenue code, 17amortization, contributions to individual retirement accounts under section 219 of 18the internal revenue code, contributions to Keogh plans, net operating loss carry-19backs and carry-forwards, capital loss carry-forwards, and disqualified losses 20deducted in determining Wisconsin adjusted gross income shall be added to 21“income”. “Income” does not include gifts from natural persons, cash 22reimbursement payments made under title XX of the federal social security act, 23surplus food or other relief in kind supplied by a governmental agency, the gain on 24the sale of a personal residence deferred under section 1034 of the internal revenue 1code or nonrecognized gain from involuntary conversions under section 1033 of the 2internal revenue code. Amounts not included in adjusted gross income but added to 3“income” under this subsection in a previous year and repaid may be subtracted 4from income for the year during which they are repaid. Scholarship and fellowship 5gifts or income that are included in Wisconsin adjusted gross income and that were 6added to household income for purposes of determining the credit under this 7subchapter in a previous year may be subtracted from income for the current year 8in determining the credit under this subchapter. A marital property agreement or 9unilateral statement under ch. 766 has no effect in computing “income” for a person 10whose homestead is not the same as the homestead of that person’s spouse.SB454,311Section 3. Initial applicability.SB454,5,1312(1) Definition of income for homestead credit. The treatment of s. 71.52 13(6) first applies to claims filed for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.SB454,5,1414